District of Columbia statutes.
6-333.02

Relocation advisory services for persons displaced by condominium conversion, or by rehabilitation, demolition, or discontinuance from housing use of building.

Whenever a building in the District of Columbia is converted from rental to condominium units, or is substantially rehabilitated or demolished, or is discontinued from housing use, the Relocation Assistance Office shall provide relocation advisory services for tenants who move from the converted, substantially rehabilitated, demolished, or discontinued building. This includes: ascertaining the relocation needs for each household; providing current information on the availability of equivalent substitute housing; supplying information concerning federal and District housing programs; and providing other advisory services to displaced persons in order to minimize hardships in adjusting to relocation.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title V, § 516, 23 DCR 9532b
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-54, § 804, 24 DCR 5334
Oct. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-121, § 2, 25 DCR 1542

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3171.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-835.
1973 Ed., § 5-732b.